Utah statutes.
78A-6-1206.   Liability.

(1)  A person or entity associated with the referral, evaluation, adjudication, disposition, or supervision of matters under this part may not be held civilly liable for any injury occurring to any person performing compensatory service or any other activity associated with a certified youth court unless the person causing the injury acted in a willful or wanton manner.

(2)  Persons participating in a certified youth court shall be considered to be volunteers for purposes of Workers' Compensation and other risk-related issues.



Amended by Chapter 356, 2009 General Session

